New York, session 2025-2026, A2302.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs b and c of subdivision 1 of section 777-a of the 2 general business law, as added by chapter 709 of the laws of 1988, are 3 amended and a new paragraph d is added to read as follows: 4 b. two years from and after the warranty date the plumbing, elec- 5 trical, heating, cooling and ventilation systems of the home will be 6 free from defects due to a failure by the builder to have installed such 7 systems in a skillful manner; [and] 8 c. six years from and after the warranty date the home will be free 9 from material defects[.]; and 10 d. ten years from and after the warranty date the home will be free 11 from mold caused by defective workmanship. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00925-01-5